North Carolina, session 2025, SB368.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MANDATE ALL OTHER PERIL COVERAGE FOR PARTICIPANTS IN THE
STATE PUBLIC EDUCATION PROPERTY INSURANCE FUND AND STATE
PROPERTY FIRE INSURANCE FUND
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 58-31A-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-31A-10. Flood insurance.insurance; all other peril insurance.
(a) Premiums for flood insurance coverage for public education buildings shall be paid
by each public education board in accordance with rates fixed by the State Fire Marshal, and the
*S368-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State Fire Marshal may purchase from insurers admitted to do business in North Carolina such
insurance or reinsurance as may be necessary to protect the State Public Education Insurance
Fund against loss with respect to such insurance coverage.
(b) Every public education board and every charter school approved pursuant to
G.S. 115C-218.5 that insures public education property titled to that board or charter school
against the direct loss or damage by insurable hazards in public education buildings and other
public education properties in the State Public Education Property Insurance Fund shall obtain
and make payment for the all other perils coverage provided by the Fund."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 58-31-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-31-10. Payment of losses on basis of actual cost of restoration or replacement; rules;
insurance and reinsurance; sprinkler leakage insurance.insurance; all other
peril insurance.
…
(d) Every State department, institution, or agency that insures State property against the
direct loss or damage by insurable hazards in the State Property Fire Insurance Fund shall obtain
and make payment for the all other perils coverage provided by the Fund."
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART II. AUTHORIZE THE OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL TO
CONTRACT FOR SPECIALIZED OR TECHNICAL SERVICES ESSENTIAL TO THE
OPERATION OF THE RISK MANAGEMENT DIVISION
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 58-31A-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-31A-15. Authority and rules for organization of system.
(a) The State Fire Marshal is hereby authorized, directed, and empowered to establish a
division to manage and operate a system of insurance for public education property. The State
Fire Marshal shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to provide all details
inherent in the insurance of public education property. The State Fire Marshal shall employ any
staff necessary, which in his or her opinion is necessary to insure and protect effectively public
education property, and he or she shall fix their compensation consistent with the policies of the
State Human Resources Commission.
(b) The State Fire Marshal shall, through the State's agent of record, contract for any
specialized or technical services necessitating expertise not otherwise available within the Office
of the State Fire Marshal that are determined by the State Fire Marshal to be essential to efficient
operations. Contracts authorized pursuant to this subsection are not subject to Article 3C of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART III. MANDATE PARTICIPATION IN THE STATE PUBLIC EDUCATION
PROPERTY INSURANCE FUND UNLESS COVERAGE WAIVER PROVIDED
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 58-31A-25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-31A-25. Insurance Mandatory insurance of property by public education boards;
notice of election to insure and information to be furnished; outstanding
policies.boards.
(a) Mandatory Insurance in the Fund. – All public education boards may shall insure all
public education property titled to that board against the direct loss or damage by insurable
hazards in public education buildings and other public education properties in the Fund. Any
property covered by an insurance policy in effect on the date when the property of a public
education board is insured in the Fund shall be insured by the Fund as of the expiration of the
policy. Each public education board shall give notice of its election to insure in the Fund at least
90 days prior to such insurance becoming effective and shall furnish to the State Fire Marshal a
full and complete list of all outstanding property insurance policies, giving in complete detail the
Page 2 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
name of the insurers, the amount of the insurance and expirations thereof. While the said
insurance policies remain in effect, the Fund shall act as coinsurer of the properties covered by
such insurance to the same extent and in the same manner as is provided for coinsurance under
the provisions of the standard form of property insurance as provided by law, and in the event of
loss shall have the same rights and duties as required by participating insurance companies.Fund,
unless a waiver has been approved for that public education board.
(b) Waiver. – A public education board may request a waiver under this section. The
Office of the State Fire Marshal shall review and approve a waiver submitted pursuant to this
subsection only if the public education board has procured sufficient minimum coverage of
relevant perils."
SECTION 3.(b) If any property titled to a public education board is covered by an
insurance policy in effect on July 1, 2025, then the Fund shall act as a coinsurer of the properties
covered by that insurance until the expiration of that policy.
SECTION 3.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART IV. NORTH CAROLINA EMERGENCY TRAINING CENTER STATE
REGISTRATION FEE WAIVER
SECTION 4.(a) Article 78A of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-78A-18. Emergency Training Center tuition waivers.
(a) Registration Fees. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall charge State
registration fees for advanced fire and rescue courses delivered by the Office of the State Fire
Marshal at the North Carolina Emergency Training Center. The State registration fee charged
shall equal the tuition amount set pursuant to G.S. 115D-39 for equivalent community college
courses.
(b) Allowed Tuition Waivers. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal may waive State
registration fees for advanced fire and rescue courses delivered by the Office of the State Fire
Marshal at the North Carolina Emergency Training Center for all of the following individuals,
entities, and members of those entities:
(1) Volunteer fire departments located within North Carolina.
(2) Municipal, county, or State fire departments located within North Carolina.
(3) Emergency medical services or rescue and lifesaving departments located
within North Carolina.
(4) Fire, emergency medical services, or rescue and lifesaving entities serving a
lake authority that was created by a North Carolina county board of
commissioners prior to July 1, 2012.
(5) The Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians fire, emergency medical services, or
rescue and lifesaving tribal government departments or programs.
(6) Firefighters, emergency medical services personnel, law enforcement
personnel, and rescue and lifesaving personnel whose duty station is located
on a military installation within North Carolina.
(7) Law enforcement personnel employed by departments located within North
Carolina.
(8) High school students at schools located within North Carolina.
(c) Fees. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal may charge additional fees to cover the
costs of textbooks, supplies, and other expenses incurred in the delivery of courses or the
operation of the North Carolina Emergency Training Center.
(d) Annual Report. – Annually by February 1 of each year, the Office of the State Fire
Marshal shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government on the number and type of waivers
granted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section."
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.(b) Funds shall be provided to the Office of the State Fire Marshal
(OSFM) based on the number of full-time equivalent (FTE) students enrolled in advanced fire
and rescue courses delivered by OSFM at the North Carolina Emergency Training Center for
whom State registration fees are waived in accordance with G.S. 58-78A-18(b). OSFM shall
calculate FTE enrollment in the same manner as community colleges. Funds provided pursuant
to this subsection shall be: (i) based on the equivalent tier-value for community college
instruction and (ii) in the same manner as funds are provided to community colleges based on
the number of FTE students enrolled in courses for which tuition and registration fees are waived
in accordance with G.S. 115D-5(b). OSFM shall not be considered a community college, as that
term is defined in G.S. 115D-2(2), or subject to the requirements imposed on community colleges
by Chapter 115D of the General Statutes.
SECTION 4.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART V. CLARIFY POWERS AND DUTIES OF STATE FIRE AND RESCUE
COMMISSION
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 58-78-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-78-5. State Fire and Rescue Commission – Powers and duties.
(a) The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
…
(18) To conduct administrative hearings in accordance with Article 3A of Chapter
150B of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 150B-38(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 150B-38. Scope; hearing required; notice; venue.
(a) The provisions of this Article shall apply to:
…
(5b) The State Fire and Rescue Commission.
…."
SECTION 5.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
administrative hearings commenced on or after that date.

PART VI. CLARIFY POWERS OF THE NORTH CAROLINA HOME INSPECTOR
LICENSURE BOARD REGARDING LICENSING EDUCATION AND EXAMINATION
FEES
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 143-151.49 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.49. Powers and responsibilities of Board.
…
(b) Education Requirements. – The education program adopted by the Board may not
consist of more than 200 hours of instruction. The instruction may include field training,
classroom instruction, distance learning, peer review, and any other educational format approved
by the Board. The Board may adopt rules regarding course content, instructor qualifications,
approved course offerings, and other criteria for compliance with the education program."
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 143-151.57 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.57. Fees.
(a) Maximum Fees. – The Board may adopt fees that do not exceed the amounts set in
the following table for administering this Article:
Item Maximum Fee
Application for home inspector license $35.00
Home inspector examinationexamination, in person 80.00
Home inspector examination, online 200.00
Issuance or renewal of home inspector license 160.00
Page 4 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Late renewal of home inspector license 30.00
Application for course approval 150.00
Renewal of course approval 75.00
Course fee, per credit hour per licensee 5.00
Credit for unapproved continuing education course 50.00
Copies of Board rules or licensure standards Cost of printing
and mailing.
…."
SECTION 6.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.

PART VII. EXEMPT MANUFACTURED HOME MANUFACTURERS AND DEALERS
FROM SALESROOM REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 7. G.S. 20-288 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-288. Application for license; license requirements; expiration of license; bond.
…
(d) To obtain a license as a wholesaler, an applicant who intends to sell or distribute
self-propelled vehicles must have an established office in this State, and an applicant who intends
to sell or distribute only trailers or semitrailers of more than 2,500 pounds unloaded weight must
have a place of business in this State where the records required under this Article are kept.
To obtain a license as a motor vehicle dealer, an applicant who intends to deal in
self-propelled vehicles must have an established salesroom in this State, and an applicant who
intends to deal in only trailers or semitrailers of more than 2,500 pounds unloaded weight must
have a place of business in this State where the records required under this Article are kept.
An applicant for a license as a manufacturer, a factory branch, a distributor, a distributor
branch, a wholesaler, or a motor vehicle dealer must have a separate license for each established
office, established salesroom, or other place of business in this State. An application for any of
these licenses shall include a list of the applicant's places of business in this State.
This subsection does not apply to manufactured home dealers, as defined by
G.S. 143-143.9(7), or manufactured home manufacturers, as defined by G.S. 143-143.9(8).
…."

PART VIII. MODERNIZE CODE OFFICIALS QUALIFICATION BOARD
STATUTORY LANGUAGE, ESTABLISH FEES AND PROCEDURES FOR BOARD
APPROVAL OF CODE ENFORCEMENT OFFICIAL TRAINING COURSES, AND
AUTHORIZE THE CREATION OF A VOLUNTARY APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM
FOR CODE ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 143-151.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.8. Definitions.
(a) The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(5) Qualified Code-enforcement Code official. – A person qualified under this
Article to engage in the practice of Code enforcement.compliance inspections
or review.
…."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 143-151.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.11. Chairman; vice-chairman; other officers; meetings; reports.
…
(d) The activities and recommendations of the Board with respect to standards for Code
officials training and certification licensing shall be set forth in regular and special reports made
by the Board. Additionally, the Board shall present special reports and recommendations to the
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Governor or the General Assembly, or both, as the need may arise or as the Governor or the
General Assembly may request."
SECTION 8.(c) G.S. 143-151.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.12. Powers.
In addition to powers conferred upon the Board elsewhere in this Article, the Board has the
power to do the following:
(1) Adopt rules necessary to administer this Article.
(1a) Require State agencies, local inspection departments, and local governing
bodies to submit reports and information about the employment, education,
and training of Code-enforcement Code officials.
(2) Establish minimum standards for employment as a Code-enforcement Code
official: (i) in probationary or temporary status, and (ii) in permanent
positions.
(3) Certify License persons as being qualified to practice Code compliance
inspections or review under the provisions of this Article to be
Code-enforcement as Code officials, including persons employed by a
federally recognized Indian Tribe to perform inspections on tribal lands.
(3a) Certify persons as being qualified under the provisions of this Article to be
North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technicians.
(4) Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of this State,
other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, junior colleges,
community colleges and other institutions concerning the development of
Code-enforcement Code compliance inspections or review training schools
and programs or courses of instruction.
(5) Establish minimum standards and levels of education or equivalent experience
for all Code-enforcement Code compliance inspections or review instructors,
teachers or professors.
(6) Conduct and encourage research by public and private agencies that shall be
designed to improve education and training in the administration of Code
enforcement.Code compliance inspections or review.
(7) Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management
and control; appoint advisory committees as necessary; and enter into
contracts and do other things as necessary and incidental to the exercise of its
authority pursuant to this Article.
(8) Make recommendations concerning any matters within its purview pursuant
to this Article.
(9) Establish within the Office of the State Fire Marshal a marketplace pool of
qualified Code-enforcement Code officials available for the following
purposes:
a. When requested by the State Fire Marshal, to assist in the discharge of
the State Fire Marshal's duty under G.S. 143-139 to supervise,
administer, and enforce the North Carolina State Building Code. The
State Fire Marshal shall have the power and authority to fix and collect
reasonable fees for services performed by Code-enforcement Code
officials under this sub-subdivision. The State Fire Marshal may also
collect reimbursement, at the rate established under G.S. 138-6, for
mileage costs incurred by Code-enforcement Code officials going to
and from inspections conducted under this sub-subdivision. The State
Fire Marshal shall have no power or authority to fix or collect fees
incurred by local inspection departments under sub-subdivision b. of
this subdivision.
Page 6 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. When requested by local inspection departments, to assist in Code
enforcement.compliance inspections or review."
SECTION 8.(d) G.S. 143-151.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.13. Required standards and certificates licenses for Code-enforcement Code
officials.
(a) No person shall engage in Code enforcement compliance inspections or review under
this Article unless that person possesses one of the following types of certificates, licenses,
currently valid, issued by the Board attesting to that person's qualifications to engage in Code
enforcement: compliance inspections or review: (i) a standard certificate; license; (ii) a limited
certificate license provided for in subsection (c) of this section; or (iii) a probationary certificate
license provided for in subsection (d) of this section. To obtain a standard certificate, license, a
person must pass an examination, as prescribed by the Board or by a contracting party under
G.S. 143-151.16(d), that is based on the North Carolina State Building Code and administrative
procedures required for Code enforcement. compliance inspections or review. The Board may
issue a standard certificate of qualification license to each person who successfully completes the
examination. The certificate license authorizes that person to engage in Code enforcement
compliance inspections or review and to practice as a qualified Code-enforcement Code official
in North Carolina. The certificate of qualification license shall bear the signatures of the chairman
and secretary of the Board.
(b) The Board shall issue one or more standard certificates licenses to each
Code-enforcement Code official demonstrating the qualifications set forth in subsection (b1) of
this section. Standard certificates licenses are available for each of the following types of
qualified Code-enforcement Code officials:
(1) Building inspector.
(2) Electrical inspector.
(3) Mechanical inspector.
(4) Plumbing inspector.
(5) Fire inspector.
(6) Residential changeout inspector.
(b1) The holder of a standard certificate license may practice Code enforcement
compliance inspections or review only within the inspection area and level described upon the
certificate license issued by the Board. A Code-enforcement Code official may qualify and hold
one or more certificates. licenses. These certificates licenses may be for different levels in
different types of positions as defined in this section and in rules adopted by the Board.
(b2) A Code-enforcement Code official holding a certificate license indicating a specified
level of proficiency in a particular type of position may hold a position calling for that type of
qualification anywhere in the State. With respect to all types of Code-enforcement Code officials,
those with Level I, Level II, or Level III certificates licenses shall be qualified to inspect and
approve only those types and sizes of buildings as specified in rules adopted by the Board.
(c) A Code-enforcement Code official holding office as of the date specified in this
subsection for the county or municipality by which he is employed, shall not be required to
possess a standard certificate license as a condition of tenure or continued employment but shall
be required to complete such in-service training as may be prescribed by the Board. At the earliest
practicable date, such official shall receive from the Board a limited certificate license qualifying
him to engage in Code enforcement compliance inspections or review at the level, in the
particular type of position, and within the governmental jurisdiction in which he is employed.
The limited certificate license shall be valid only as an authorization for the official to continue
in the position he held on the applicable date and shall become invalid if he does not complete
in-service training within two years following the applicable date in the schedule below,
according to the governmental jurisdiction's population as published in the 1970 U.S. Census:
Counties and Municipalities over 75,000 population – July 1, 1979
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Counties and Municipalities between 50,001 and 75,000 – July 1, 1981
Counties and Municipalities between 25,001 and 50,000 – July 1, 1983
Counties and Municipalities 25,000 and under – July 1, 1985
All fire prevention inspectors holding office – July 1, 1989. Fire prevention inspectors have
until July 1, 1993, to complete in-service training.
An official holding a limited certificate license can be promoted to a position requiring a
higher level certificate license only upon issuance by the Board of a standard certificate license
or probationary certificate license appropriate for such new position.
(d) The Board may provide for the issuance of probationary or temporary certificates
licenses valid for such period (not less than one year nor more than three years) as specified by
the Board's rules, or until June 30, 1983, whichever is later, to any Code-enforcement Code
official newly employed or newly promoted who lacks the qualifications prescribed by the Board
as prerequisite to applying for a standard certificate license under subsection (a). No official may
have a probationary or temporary certificate license extended beyond the specified period by
renewal or otherwise. The Board may provide for appropriate levels of probationary or temporary
certificates licenses and may issue these certificates licenses with such special conditions or
requirements relating to the place of employment of the person holding the certificate, license,
his supervision on a consulting or advisory basis, or other matters as the Board may deem
necessary to protect the public safety and health.
(e) The Board shall, without requiring an examination, issue a standard certificate license
to any person who is currently certified as a county electrical inspector pursuant to
G.S. 160D-1102. The certificate license issued by the Board shall authorize the person to serve
at the electrical inspector level approved by the State Fire Marshal in G.S. 160D-1102.
(f) The Board shall issue a standard certificate license to any person who passes the
examination required under subsection (a) of this section and is currently licensed to practice as
a(n):any of the following:
(1) Architect, registered licensed pursuant to Chapter 83A;83A of the General
Statutes.
(2) General contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 87;87 of the
General Statutes.
(3) Plumbing or heating contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter
87;87 of the General Statutes.
(4) Electrical contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 87; or,87 of the
General Statutes.
(5) Professional engineer, registered licensed pursuant to Chapter 89C;89C of the
General Statutes.
provided the person successfully completes a short course, as prescribed by the Board, relating
to the State Building Code regulations and Code-enforcement administration. The standard
certificate license shall authorize the person to practice as a qualified Code-enforcement Code
official in a particular type of position at the level determined by the Board, based on the type of
license or registration held in any profession specified above.
(g) A licensed architect or licensed professional engineer who possesses a valid
certificate license under subsection (f) of this section, but is not employed by the State or a local
government, may utilize that certificate license for the limited purpose of performing independent
third-party plan review under subsections (d) and (e) of G.S. 160D-1110.1.
(h) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, the Board, in conjunction with
the Office of the State Fire Marshal, may establish a voluntary apprenticeship program for any
license issued under this section. The program shall consist of coursework and supervised work
under a certified Code official in the relevant discipline. A trainee must pass a standard
examination prior to issuance of any license. The Board may charge a fee for participation in the
program. The fee shall not exceed the cost of the program."
Page 8 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 8.(e) G.S. 143-151.13A reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.13A. Professional development program for officials.officials; course sponsor
fees.
(a) As used in this section, "official" means a qualified Code-enforcement Code official
as that term is defined in G.S. 143-151.8.
(b) The Board may establish professional development requirements for officials as a
condition of the renewal or reactivation of their certificates. licenses. The purposes of these
professional development requirements are to assist officials in maintaining professional
competence in their enforcement of the Code and to assure the health, safety, and welfare of the
citizens of North Carolina. An official subject to this section shall present evidence to the Board
at each certificate license renewal after initial certification, licensure that during the 12 months
before the certificate license expiration date, the official has completed the required number of
credit hours in courses approved by the Board. Annual continuing education hour requirements
shall be determined by the Board but shall not be more than six credit hours.
(c) The Board may require an individual who earns a certificate license under programs
established in G.S. 143-151.13 to complete professional development courses, not to exceed six
hours in each technical area of certification, licensure within one year after that individual is first
employed by a city or county inspection department.
(d) As a condition of reactivating a standard or limited certificate, license, the Board may
require the completion of professional development courses within one year after reemployment
as an official as follows:
(1) An individual who has been on inactive status for more than two years and
who has not been continuously employed by a city or county inspection
department during the period of inactive status shall complete professional
development courses not to exceed six hours for each technical area in which
the individual is certified.licensed.
(2) An individual who has been on inactive status for more than two years and
who has been continuously employed by a city or county inspection
department during the period of inactive status shall complete professional
development courses not to exceed three hours for each technical area in
which the individual is certified.licensed.
(3) An individual who has been on inactive status for two years or less shall
complete professional development courses not to exceed two hours for each
technical area in which the individual is certified.licensed.
(e) The Board may, for good cause shown, grant extensions of time to officials to comply
with these requirements. An official who, after obtaining an extension under this subsection,
offers evidence satisfactory to the Board that the official has satisfactorily completed the required
professional development courses, is in compliance with this section.
(f) The Board may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that govern:
(1) The content and subject matter of professional development courses.
(2) The criteria, standards, and procedures for the approval of courses, course
sponsors, and course instructors.
(3) The methods of instruction.
(4) The computation of course credit.
(5) The ability to carry-forward course credit from one year to another.
(6) The waiver of or variance from the professional development required for
hardship or other reasons.
(7) The procedures for compliance and sanctions for noncompliance.
(g) Each course sponsor shall pay the Board a fee of one dollar ($1.00) per approved
credit hour per individual who successfully completes a course under the provisions of this
section.
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) At the time a course sponsor submits an application to the Board for approval of a
course under the provisions of this section, the sponsor shall pay to the State Fire Marshal a filing
fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course up to a maximum of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) per calendar year.
(i) An official who selects a course other than one offered by an approved course sponsor
and who seeks approval of the course pursuant to rules adopted by the Board shall, upon approval
of the course, pay a fee of one dollar ($1.00) per approved credit hour."
SECTION 8.(f) G.S. 143-151.14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.14. Comity.
(a) The Board may, without requiring an examination, grant a standard certificate license
as a qualified Code-enforcement Code official for a particular type of position and level to any
person who, at the time of application, is certified as a qualified Code-enforcement Code official
in good standing by a similar board of another state, district or territory where standards are
acceptable to the Board and not lower than those required by this Article for a similar type of
position and level in this State.
(b) The Board may, without requiring an examination, grant a standard certificate license
as a qualified Code-enforcement Code official for a particular type of position and level to any
person who, at the time of application, is certified licensed as a qualified Code-enforcement Code
official in good standing by the International Code Council Council, the United States
Department of Defense, or the International Fire Services Accreditation Congress where
standards and examination are acceptable to the Board and not lower than those required by this
Article for a type of position and level in this State.
(c) The certificates licenses granted under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall
expire after three years unless within that time period the holder completes a short course, as
prescribed by the Board, relating to the State Building Code regulations and Code-enforcement
Code compliance inspection or review administration.
(d) A fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20.00), as determined by the Board, must be
paid by any applicant to the Board for the issuance of a certificate license under this section. The
provisions of G.S. 143-151.16(b) relating to renewal fees and late renewals shall apply to every
person granted a standard certificate license in accordance with this section."
SECTION 8.(g) G.S. 143-151.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.15. Return of certificate license to Board; reissuance by Board.
A certificate license issued by the Board under this Article is valid as long as the person
certified licensed is employed by the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision thereof
as a Code-enforcement Code official, or is employed by a federally recognized Indian Tribe to
perform inspections on tribal lands as a Code-enforcement Code official. When the person
certified licensed leaves that employment for any reason, he shall return the certificate license to
the Board. If the person subsequently obtains employment as a Code-enforcement Code official
in any governmental jurisdiction described above, the Board may reissue the certificate license
to him. The provisions of G.S. 143-151.16(b) relating to renewal fees and late renewals shall
apply, if appropriate. The provisions of G.S. 143-151.16(c) shall not apply. This section does not
affect the Board's powers under G.S. 143-151.17."
SECTION 8.(h) G.S. 143-151.16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.16. Certification License fees; renewal of certificates; licenses; examination fees.
(a) The Board shall establish a schedule of fees to be paid by each applicant for
certification licensure as a qualified Code-enforcement Code official. Such fee shall not exceed
twenty dollars ($20.00) for each applicant.license application.
(b) A certificate, license, other than a probationary certificate, license, as a qualified
Code-enforcement Code official issued pursuant to the provisions of this Article must be renewed
annually on or before the first day of July. June 30. Each application for renewal must be
accompanied by a renewal fee to be determined by the Board, but not to exceed ten dollars
Page 10 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($10.00). fifty dollars ($50.00). The Board is authorized to charge an extra four dollar ($4.00)
late renewal fee for renewals made after the first day of July June 30 each year.
(c) Any person who fails to renew his certificate license for a period of two consecutive
years may be required by the Board to take and pass the same examination as unlicensed
applicants before allowing such person to renew his certificate.license.
…
(e) The Board shall approve course offerings for all continuing education programs and
may charge a fee of up to one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course for review and approval of
the continuing education program."
SECTION 8.(i) G.S. 143-151.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.17. Grounds for disciplinary actions; investigation; administrative procedures.
(a) The Board has the power to suspend, revoke, demote to a lower level, or refuse to
grant a certificate license issued under this Article to any person to whom any of the following
applies:
(1) Has been convicted of a felony against this State or the United States, or
convicted of a felony in another state that would also be a felony if it had been
committed in this State.
(2) Has obtained certification licensure through fraud, deceit, or perjury.
(3) Has knowingly aided or abetted any person practicing contrary to the
provisions of this Article or the State Building Code or any building codes
adopted by a federally recognized Indian Tribe.
(4) Has defrauded the public or attempted to do so.
(5) Has affixed his or her signature to a report of inspection or other instrument
of service if no inspection has been made by him or her or under his or her
immediate and responsible direction.
(6) Has been guilty of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or gross
incompetence.
(b) The Board may investigate the actions of any qualified Code-enforcement Code
official or applicant upon the verified complaint in writing of any person alleging a violation of
subsection (a) of this section. The Board may suspend, revoke, or demote to a lower level any
certificate license of any qualified Code-enforcement Code official and refuse to grant a
certificate license to any applicant, whom it finds to have been guilty of one or more of the actions
set out in subsection (a) of this section as grounds for disciplinary action.
(c) A denial, suspension, revocation, or demotion to a lower level of a certificate license
issued under this Article shall be made in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
(d) The Board may deny an application for a certificate license for any of the grounds
that are described in subsection (a) of this section. Within 30 days after receipt of a notification
that an application for a certificate license has been denied, the applicant may make a written
request for a review by a committee designated by the chairman of the Board to determine the
reasonableness of the Board's action. The review shall be completed without undue delay, and
the applicant shall be notified promptly in writing as to the outcome of the review. Within 30
days after service of the notification as to the outcome, the applicant may make a written request
for a hearing under Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes if the applicant disagrees
with the outcome.
(e) This section applies to Code-enforcement Code officials and applicants who are
employed or seek to be employed by a federally recognized Indian Tribe to perform inspections
on tribal lands."
SECTION 8.(j) G.S. 143-151.18 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.18. Violations; penalty; injunction.
On and after July 1, 1979, it shall be unlawful for any person to represent himself as a
qualified Code-enforcement Code official who does not hold a currently valid certificate of
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
qualification license issued by the Board. Further, it shall be unlawful for any person to practice
Code enforcement compliance inspections or review except as allowed by any currently valid
certificate license issued to that person by the Board. Any person violating any of the provisions
of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Board is authorized to apply to any
judge of the superior court for an injunction in order to prevent any violation or threatened
violation of the provisions of this Article."
SECTION 8.(k) G.S. 143-151.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.19. Administration.
(a) The Division of Engineering and Building Codes in the Department of Insurance
Office of the State Fire Marshal shall provide clerical and other staff services required by the
Board, and shall administer and enforce all provisions of this Article and all rules promulgated
pursuant to this Article, subject to the direction of the Board, except as delegated by this Article
to local units of government, other State agencies, corporations, or individuals.
(b) The Board shall make copies of this Article and the rules adopted under this Article
available to the public at a price determined by the Board.
(c) The Board shall keep current a record of the names and addresses of all qualified
Code-enforcement Code officials and additional personal data as the Board deems necessary.
The Board annually shall publish a list maintain a directory of all currently certified
Code-enforcement licensed Code officials.
(d) Each certificate license issued by the Board shall contain such identifying information
as the Board requires.
(e) The Board shall issue a duplicate certificate license to practice as a qualified
Code-enforcement Code official in place of one which has been lost, destroyed, or mutilated
upon proper application and payment of a fee to be determined by the Board."
SECTION 8.(l) G.S. 143-151.20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.20. Donations and appropriations.
…
(b) The Board may provide grants as a reimbursement for actual expenses incurred by
the State or political subdivision thereof for the provisions of training programs of officials from
other jurisdictions within the State. The Board, by rules, shall provide for the administration of
the grant program authorized herein. In promulgating such rules, the Board shall promote the
most efficient and economical program of Code-enforcement Code compliance inspection or
review training, including the maximum utilization of existing facilities and programs for the
purpose of avoiding duplication."
SECTION 8.(m) G.S. 143-151.21 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.21. Disposition of fees.
Fees collected by the State Fire Marshal under this Article shall be credited to the Insurance
Regulatory Fund created under G.S. 58-6-25.deposited in the State treasury to the account of the
Board."
SECTION 8.(n) G.S. 143-151.22, as enacted by Section 3.4(b) of S.L. 2024-49,
reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.22. North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician; certification
program; professional development requirements; renewal of certificates; fees;
exam waivers.
(a) State Building Code Permit Technician Certification Program. – The Board shall
develop a North Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician certification program and North
Carolina State Building Code Permit Technician Certificate. To obtain a certificate, a person
must pass an examination, as prescribed by the Board, that is based on the North Carolina State
Building Code, administrative procedures applicable to permit administration, and relevant
topics in support of Code-enforcement Code officials and local inspection departments. The
Page 12 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Board may issue a certificate to each person who successfully completes the examination. The
certificate shall bear the signatures of the chairman and secretary of the Board.
…
(e) Qualified Code-Enforcement Code Official Exam Waiver. – The Board shall, without
requiring an examination, grant a certificate pursuant to this section to any person who, at the
time of application, possesses a Building Inspector standard certificate license issued by the
Board and who is in good standing. The Board may assess a fee for a certificate issued pursuant
to this subsection, to the extent authorized by subsection (d) of this section for an initial
certification.
…."
SECTION 8.(o) G.S. 143-151.23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.23. Disasters and emergencies; temporary certificates.licenses.
(a) When a state of emergency, as defined in G.S. 166A-19.3, has been declared by the
Governor due to a natural disaster such as a hurricane, tornado, or flood, or due to a pending
disaster, the Board may issue temporary standard or limited certificates licenses to retired
qualified Code-enforcement Code officials to conduct Code enforcement compliance inspections
or review in the emergency area, as defined in G.S. 166A-19.3, for the duration of the state of
emergency.
(b) A temporary standard or limited certificate license issued under this section shall
expire at the termination of the state of emergency or 12 months, whichever is earlier. If after 12
months the state of emergency has not expired, the Board may renew the temporary standard or
limited certificate.license.
(c) A qualified Code-enforcement Code official who has been on inactive status and is
issued a temporary standard or limited certificate license under this section shall not be subject
to the continuing education requirements established pursuant to G.S. 143-151.13A, unless the
individual has been inactive or retired over two years and not continuously employed by a city
or county inspection department."
SECTION 8.(p) Transition from Certificates to Licenses. – The following provisions
shall govern the transition from certificates previously issued by the Code Officials Qualification
Board to licenses under this section:
(1) Automatic conversion. – All individuals holding valid probationary, standard,
or limited Code-official certificates issued by the Board as of the effective
date of this section shall automatically be deemed to hold the equivalent
licenses issued under Article 9C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, as
amended by this section, without further examination, application, fees, or
additional qualification requirements. These licenses shall authorize holders
to engage in Code-enforcement or Code compliance inspection or review
activities to the same extent and under the same conditions as the certificates
previously held.
(2) Pending applications. – An application for certification submitted prior to the
effective date of this section, which remains pending on that date, shall be
processed as an application for licensure. Such application shall not require
resubmission or additional qualifications solely due to the change in
designation from certificate to license provided by this section. A license
issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be approved under the same
conditions and standards that applied to certification immediately prior to the
effective date of this section.
(3) Renewal of licenses. – Upon expiration of any certificate converted into a
license under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Board shall permit
individuals to renew their credential under the standards applicable to a license
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
in accordance with the renewal provisions of G.S. 143-151.16, as amended by
subsection (h) of this section.
SECTION 8.(q) Effective Date. – This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.

PART IX. CLARIFY ELECTRICAL CODE REQUIREMENTS FOR ENERGIZING
BUILDINGS
SECTION 9. G.S. 143-143.2(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The electric wiring of houses or buildings for lighting or for other purposes shall
conform to the requirements of the North Carolina State Building Code Electrical Code and other
applicable State and local laws."

PART X. EXTEND EXEMPTION FROM DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
OWNERSHIP OF PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLES USED PRIMARILY FOR
LAW-ENFORCEMENT, FIRE, OR EMERGENCY PURPOSES TO THE OFFICE OF
THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL
SECTION 10. G.S. 143-341 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-341. Powers and duties of Department.
The Department of Administration has the following powers and duties:
…
(8) General Services:
…
i. To establish and operate a central motor fleet and such subsidiary
related facilities as the Secretary may deem necessary, and to that end:
…
3. To require on a schedule determined by the Department all
State agencies to transfer ownership, custody or control of any
or all passenger motor vehicles within the ownership, custody
or control of that agency to the Department, except those motor
vehicles vehicles: (i) under the ownership, custody or control
of the Highway Patrol, the State Bureau of Investigation, the
State Capitol Police, the Alcohol Law Enforcement Division
of the Department of Public Safety, the Samarcand Training
Academy, or the constituent institutions of The University of
North Carolina which are used primarily for law-enforcement
purposes.purposes or (ii) under the ownership, custody or
control of the Office of the State Fire Marshal which are used
primarily for law-enforcement, fire, or emergency purposes.
…."

PART XI. ENHANCE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL OVER LOCAL
INSPECTIONS, FEES, RECORDS, AND EMERGENCY ELECTRICAL INSPECTIONS
SECTION 11.(a) G.S. 58-78A-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-78A-15. State Fire Marshal to supervise local inspectors.
(a) The State Fire Marshal shall exercise general supervision over local investigators of
fires and fire prevention inspectors. Whenever the State Fire Marshal has reason to believe that
the local inspectors are not doing their duty, the State Fire Marshal or the State Fire Marshal's
deputy shall make special trips of inspection and take proper steps to have all the provisions of
the law relative to the investigation of fires and the prevention of fire waste enforced.
(b) The State Fire Marshal shall exercise general supervision over local inspection
departments, including departments that issue permits for work subject to the North Carolina
State Building Code. If the State Fire Marshal determines that a local inspection department has
Page 14 Senate Bill 368-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
failed to provide inspection services, ceased providing inspection services, or is otherwise failing
to adequately fulfill its duties under this Chapter or Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, the
State Fire Marshal shall initiate appropriate corrective actions as provided by G.S. 160D-1102(b).
Such actions may include arranging alternate inspection services, suspending the local inspection
department's authority, and assigning inspection duties to another jurisdiction or directly to the
State. A local government whose inspection authority has been suspended under this subsection
may resume providing inspection services only in accordance with the requirements set forth in
G.S. 160D-1102(b). Nothing in this Chapter shall prohibit the State Fire Marshal or the State
from directly performing inspection duties for any jurisdiction whose inspection department has
been suspended.
(c) During any declared state of emergency or disaster, including a state emergency
declared pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.20 or G.S. 166A-19.22 or a federal emergency or major
disaster declared pursuant to the Stafford Act (P.L. 93-288), the State Fire Marshal shall have
authority to decree alternative methods for achieving compliance with the North Carolina State
Building Code and to evaluate and approve any system regulated by the North Carolina State
Building Code in the State by any means necessary. During emergencies and disasters, the State
Fire Marshal shall have the authority to allow persons licensed as an electrical contractor, as
defined in Article 4 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, to evaluate and approve systems
regulated by the North Carolina Electrical Code and appropriate for such license directly affected
by such events."
SECTION 11.(b) G.S. 160D-402(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Financial Support. – The local government may appropriate for the support of the
staff any funds that it deems necessary. It shall have power to fix reasonable fees for support,
administration, and implementation of programs authorized by this Chapter. All fees collected
by a building inspection department for the administration and enforcement of provisions set
forth in Article 11 of this Chapter shall be used to support the administration and operations of
the building inspection department and for no other purposes. When an inspection, for which the
permit holder has paid a fee to the local government, is performed by a marketplace pool
Code-enforcement official upon request of the State Fire Marshal under G.S. 143-151.12(9)a.,
the local government shall promptly return to the permit holder the fee collected by the local
government for such inspection. Whenever an inspections department has been suspended under
G.S. 58-78A-15(b), the local government shall remit all building permit, inspection, and
reinspection fees collected by the local government for inspections to be conducted during the
suspension period to the jurisdiction assigned to perform the inspections. This subsection applies
to the following types of inspection: plumbing, electrical systems, general building restrictions
and regulations, heating and air-conditioning, and the general construction of buildings."
SECTION 11.(c) G.S. 160D-1126 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-1126. Records and reports.
The inspection department shall keep complete and accurate records as prescribed by the
Engineering Division of the Office of the State Fire Marshal in convenient form of all
applications received, permits issued, inspections and reinspections made, defects found,
certificates of compliance or occupancy granted, and all other work and activities of the
department. These records shall be kept in the manner and for the periods prescribed by the
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. Periodic reports shall be submitted to the
governing board and to the State Fire Marshal as prescribed by the Engineering Division of the
Office of the State Fire Marshal and they shall by ordinance, rule, or other regulation require.
Any inspection department that fails to comply with this section shall be subject to suspension
as described in G.S. 58-78A-15(b)."
SECTION 11.(d) Effective Date. – This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART XII. RULEMAKING, SEVERABILITY CLAUSE, AND EFFECTIVE DATE
Senate Bill 368-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 12.(a) Rulemaking Authority. – The Office of the State Fire Marshal, the
State Fire and Rescue Commission, the North Carolina Home Inspector Licensure Board, and
the North Carolina Code Officials Qualification Board shall adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this act.
SECTION 12.(b) Severability. – If any provision of this act or the application thereof
to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and,
to this end, the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 12.(c) Effective Date. – Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective
when it becomes law.
Page 16 Senate Bill 368-First Edition